Utah statutes.
48-2e-704.   Power of legal representative of deceased partner.

If a partner dies, the deceased partner's legal representative may exercise:

(1)  the rights of a transferee provided in Subsection 48-2e-702(3); and

(2)  for the purposes of settling the estate, the rights of a current limited partner under Section 48-2e-304.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

